Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.040

STEM education report card—Coordination of data collection and analysis—Reports by education agencies and the employment security department.

(1) The STEM education innovation alliance shall develop a STEM education report card, based on the STEM framework for action and accountability, to monitor progress in increasing learning opportunities and aligning strategic plans and activities in order to prepare students for STEM-related jobs and careers, with the longer-term goal of improving educational, workforce, and economic outcomes in STEM.

(2) The report card must:

(a) Illustrate the most recent data for the indicators and measures of the STEM framework for action and accountability;

(b) Provide information from state education agencies that indicates the extent that activities and resources are aligned with and support the STEM framework for action and accountability;

(c) Provide data regarding current and projected STEM job openings in the state; and

(d) Be prominently displayed on a website designed for this purpose.

(3)(a) The education data center under RCW 43.41.400 must coordinate data collection and analysis to support the report card.

(b) The state education agencies must annually report on how their policies, activities, and expenditures of public resources align with and support the STEM framework for action and accountability. The focus of the reporting under this subsection is on programs and initiatives specifically identified in law or budget proviso as related to STEM education. The agencies must use a common metric for the reporting, designed by the education data center in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance. For the purposes of this section, "state education agencies" includes the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the professional educator standards board, the state board of education, and the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) The employment security department must create an annual report on current and projected job openings in STEM fields and submit the report to the education data center for inclusion in the STEM education report card.

(4) The STEM education innovation alliance must publish the first STEM education report card with baseline data on the identified measures by January 10, 2014, and must update the report card by each January 10th thereafter.

[ 2018 c 58 s 30; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.